Nebraska, session 109, LB851.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2716, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2716 (1) The following adjustments to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be made for interest or dividends received:
(a)(i) There shall be subtracted interest or dividends received by
the owner of obligations of the United States and its territories and
possessions or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the
United States to the extent includable in gross income for federal income
tax purposes but exempt from state income taxes under the laws of the
United States; and
(ii) There shall be subtracted interest received by the owner of
obligations of the State of Nebraska or its political subdivisions or
authorities which are Build America Bonds to the extent includable in
gross income for federal income tax purposes;
(b) There shall be subtracted that portion of the total dividends
and other income received from a regulated investment company which is
attributable to obligations described in subdivision (a) of this
subsection as reported to the recipient by the regulated investment
company;
(c) There shall be added interest or dividends received by the owner
of obligations of the District of Columbia, other states of the United
States, or their political subdivisions, authorities, commissions, or
instrumentalities to the extent excluded in the computation of gross
income for federal income tax purposes except that such interest or
dividends shall not be added if received by a corporation which is a
regulated investment company;
(d) There shall be added that portion of the total dividends and
other income received from a regulated investment company which is
attributable to obligations described in subdivision (c) of this
subsection and excluded for federal income tax purposes as reported to
-2-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
the recipient by the regulated investment company; and
(e)(i) Any amount subtracted under this subsection shall be reduced
by any interest on indebtedness incurred to carry the obligations or
securities described in this subsection or the investment in the
regulated investment company and by any expenses incurred in the
production of interest or dividend income described in this subsection to
the extent that such expenses, including amortizable bond premiums, are
deductible in determining federal taxable income.
(ii) Any amount added under this subsection shall be reduced by any
expenses incurred in the production of such income to the extent
disallowed in the computation of federal taxable income.
(2) There shall be allowed a net operating loss derived from or
connected with Nebraska sources computed under rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the Tax Commissioner consistent, to the extent
possible under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with the laws of the
United States. For a resident individual, estate, or trust, the net
operating loss computed on the federal income tax return shall be
adjusted by the modifications contained in this section. For a
nonresident individual, estate, or trust or for a partial-year resident
individual, the net operating loss computed on the federal return shall
be adjusted by the modifications contained in this section and any
carryovers or carrybacks shall be limited to the portion of the loss
derived from or connected with Nebraska sources.
(3) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income for
all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, the amount of
any state income tax refund to the extent such refund was deducted under
the Internal Revenue Code, was not allowed in the computation of the tax
due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and is included in federal
adjusted gross income.
(4) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2026, federal Federal adjusted gross income, or, for a fiduciary, federal
-3-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
taxable income shall be modified to exclude the portion of the income or
loss received from a small business corporation with an election in
effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code or from a limited
liability company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act that is not derived from or connected with Nebraska
sources as determined in section 77-2734.01.
(5) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income or,
for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income dividends
received or deemed to be received from corporations which are not subject
to the Internal Revenue Code.
(6) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income a portion
of the income earned by a corporation subject to the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 that is actually taxed by a foreign country or one of its
political subdivisions at a rate in excess of the maximum federal tax
rate for corporations. The taxpayer may make the computation for each
foreign country or for groups of foreign countries. The portion of the
taxes that may be deducted shall be computed in the following manner:
(a) The amount of federal taxable income from operations within a
foreign taxing jurisdiction shall be reduced by the amount of taxes
actually paid to the foreign jurisdiction that are not deductible solely
because the foreign tax credit was elected on the federal income tax
return;
(b) The amount of after-tax income shall be divided by one minus the
maximum tax rate for corporations in the Internal Revenue Code; and
(c) The result of the calculation in subdivision (b) of this
subsection shall be subtracted from the amount of federal taxable income
used in subdivision (a) of this subsection. The result of such
calculation, if greater than zero, shall be subtracted from federal
taxable income.
(7) Federal adjusted gross income shall be modified to exclude any
amount repaid by the taxpayer for which a reduction in federal tax is
-4-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
allowed under section 1341(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(8)(a) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be reduced, to the extent
included, by income from interest, earnings, and state contributions
received from the Nebraska educational savings plan trust as provided in
sections 77-1415 to 77-1430 and any account established under the
achieving a better life experience program as provided in sections
77-1401 to 77-1409.
(b) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be reduced by any contributions
as a participant in the Nebraska educational savings plan trust, any
contributions to an account established under the achieving a better life
experience program made for the benefit of a beneficiary as provided in
sections 77-1401 to 77-1409, or any contributions to the Give to Enable
Support Cash Fund as provided in the Give to Enable Support Act, to the
extent not deducted for federal income tax purposes, but not to exceed
five thousand dollars per married filing separate return or ten thousand
dollars for any other return. With respect to a qualified rollover within
the meaning of section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code from another
state's plan, any interest, earnings, and state contributions received
from the other state's educational savings plan which is qualified under
section 529 of the code shall qualify for the reduction provided in this
subdivision. For contributions by a custodian of a custodial account
including rollovers from another custodial account, the reduction shall
only apply to funds added to the custodial account after January 1, 2014.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced, to the extent included in
the adjusted gross income of an individual, by the amount of any
contribution made by the individual's employer into an account under the
Nebraska educational savings plan trust owned by the individual, not to
-5-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
exceed five thousand dollars per married filing separate return or ten
thousand dollars for any other return.
(d) Federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and
fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased by:
(i) The amount resulting from the cancellation of a participation
agreement refunded to the taxpayer as a participant in the Nebraska
educational savings plan trust to the extent previously deducted under
subdivision (8)(b) of this section; and
(ii) The amount of any withdrawals by the owner of an account
established under the achieving a better life experience program as
provided in sections 77-1401 to 77-1409 for nonqualified expenses to the
extent previously deducted under subdivision (8)(b) of this section.
(9)(a) For income tax returns filed after September 10, 2001, for
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1, 2006, under
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall
be increased by eighty-five percent of any amount of any federal bonus
depreciation received under the federal Job Creation and Worker
Assistance Act of 2002 or the federal Jobs and Growth Tax Act of 2003,
under section 168(k) or section 1400L of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, for assets placed in service after September 10, 2001,
and before December 31, 2005.
(b) For a partnership, limited liability company, cooperative,
including any cooperative exempt from income taxes under section 521 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, limited cooperative
association, subchapter S corporation, or joint venture, the increase
shall be distributed to the partners, members, shareholders, patrons, or
beneficiaries in the same manner as income is distributed for use against
their income tax liabilities.
(c) For a corporation with a unitary business having activity both
inside and outside the state, the increase shall be apportioned to
-6-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
Nebraska in the same manner as income is apportioned to the state by
section 77-2734.05.
(d) The amount of bonus depreciation added to federal adjusted gross
income or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income by
this subsection shall be subtracted in a later taxable year. Twenty
percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added back by this
subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2003, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, may be
subtracted in the first taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, and twenty percent in each of the next four following taxable
years. Twenty percent of the total amount of bonus depreciation added
back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first taxable year
beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent in each of
the next four following taxable years.
(10) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2003, and before January 1, 2006, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income shall be increased
by the amount of any capital investment that is expensed under section
179 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that is in excess
of twenty-five thousand dollars that is allowed under the federal Jobs
and Growth Tax Act of 2003. Twenty percent of the total amount of
expensing added back by this subsection for tax years beginning or deemed
to begin on or after January 1, 2003, may be subtracted in the first
taxable year beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and twenty percent
in each of the next four following tax years.
(11)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before
-7-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
January 1, 2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by contributions, up to
two thousand dollars per married filing jointly return or one thousand
dollars for any other return, and any investment earnings made as a
participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the Long-
Term Care Savings Plan Act, to the extent not deducted for federal income
tax purposes.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2018, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, federal
adjusted gross income shall be increased by the withdrawals made as a
participant in the Nebraska long-term care savings plan under the act by
a person who is not a qualified individual or for any reason other than
transfer of funds to a spouse, long-term care expenses, long-term care
insurance premiums, or death of the participant, including withdrawals
made by reason of cancellation of the participation agreement, to the
extent previously deducted as a contribution or as investment earnings.
(12) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income for
individuals, estates, and trusts any amount taken as a credit for
franchise tax paid by a financial institution under sections 77-3801 to
77-3807 as allowed by subsection (5) of section 77-2715.07.
(13)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced
by the amount received as benefits under the federal Social Security Act
which are included in the federal adjusted gross income if:
(i) For taxpayers filing a married filing joint return, federal
adjusted gross income is fifty-eight thousand dollars or less; or
(ii) For taxpayers filing any other return, federal adjusted gross
income is forty-three thousand dollars or less.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
-8-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
Code of 1986, as amended, the Tax Commissioner shall adjust the dollar
amounts provided in subdivisions (13)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section by
the same percentage used to adjust individual income tax brackets under
subsection (3) of section 77-2715.03.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal
adjusted gross income allowed under this subsection or the reduction to
federal adjusted gross income allowed under subsection (14) of this
section, whichever provides the greater reduction.
(14)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by a percentage of the
social security benefits that are received and included in federal
adjusted gross income. The pertinent percentage shall be:
(i) Five percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(ii) Forty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2023, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(iii) Sixty percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2024, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(iv) One hundred percent for taxable years beginning or deemed to
begin on or after January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, social security benefits means
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act.
(c) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, and before January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue
-9-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
Code of 1986, as amended, a taxpayer may claim the reduction to federal
adjusted gross income allowed under this subsection or the reduction to
federal adjusted gross income allowed under subsection (13) of this
section, whichever provides the greater reduction.
(15)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2015, and before January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, an individual may make a one-time election
within two calendar years after the date of his or her retirement from
the military to exclude income received as a military retirement benefit
by the individual to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income
and as provided in this subdivision. The individual may elect to exclude
forty percent of his or her military retirement benefit income for seven
consecutive taxable years beginning with the year in which the election
is made or may elect to exclude fifteen percent of his or her military
retirement benefit income for all taxable years beginning with the year
in which he or she turns sixty-seven years of age.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may exclude one hundred percent of the military retirement
benefit income received by such individual to the extent included in
federal adjusted gross income.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, military retirement benefit
means retirement benefits that are periodic payments attributable to
service in the uniformed services of the United States for personal
services performed by an individual prior to his or her retirement. The
term includes retirement benefits described in this subdivision that are
reported to the individual on either:
(i) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the United
States Department of Defense; or
(ii) An Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-R received from the
United States Office of Personnel Management.
-10-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
(16) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2021, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount received as
a Segal AmeriCorps Education Award, to the extent such amount is included
in federal adjusted gross income.
(17) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income shall be reduced by the amount received by
or on behalf of a firefighter for cancer benefits under the Firefighter
Cancer Benefits Act to the extent included in federal adjusted gross
income.
(18) There shall be subtracted from the federal adjusted gross
income of individuals any amount received by the individual as student
loan repayment assistance under the Teach in Nebraska Today Act, to the
extent such amount is included in federal adjusted gross income.
(19) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2023, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
retired individual who was employed full time as a firefighter or
certified law enforcement officer for at least twenty years and who is at
least sixty years of age as of the end of the taxable year may reduce his
or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount of health insurance
premiums paid by such individual during the taxable year, to the extent
such premiums were not already deducted in determining the individual's
federal adjusted gross income.
(20) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the
amounts received as annuities under the Civil Service Retirement System
which were earned for being employed by the federal government, to the
extent such amounts are included in federal adjusted gross income.
(21) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
-11-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual who is a member of the Nebraska National Guard may exclude one
hundred percent of the income received from any of the following sources
to the extent such income is included in the individual's federal
adjusted gross income:
(a) Serving in a 32 U.S.C. duty status such as members attending
drills, annual training, and military schools and members who are serving
in a 32 U.S.C. active guard reserve or active duty for operational
support duty status;
(b) Employment as a 32 U.S.C. federal dual-status technician with
the Nebraska National Guard; or
(c) Serving in a state active duty status.
(22)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual may reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the
amount of interest and principal balance of medical debt discharged under
the Medical Debt Relief Act, to the extent included in such individual's
federal adjusted gross income.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced by the amount of contributions
made to the Medical Debt Relief Fund, to the extent not deducted for
federal income tax purposes.
(23) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, an
individual who is a qualifying employee as defined in section 77-3108 may
reduce his or her federal adjusted gross income by the amount allowed
under section 77-3111.
(24) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
-12-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
federal adjusted gross income or, for corporations and fiduciaries,
federal taxable income shall be reduced by the amounts allowed to be
deducted pursuant to section 77-27,242.
(25) There shall be added to federal adjusted gross income or, for
corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any net
capital loss that is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or silver
bullion to the extent such loss is included in federal adjusted gross
income except that such loss shall not be added if the loss is derived
from the sale of bullion as a taxable distribution from any retirement
plan account that holds gold or silver bullion. For the purposes of this
subsection, bullion has the same meaning as in section 77-2704.66.
(26) There shall be subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
or, for corporations and fiduciaries, federal taxable income for all
taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of any
net capital gain that is derived from the sale or exchange of gold or
silver bullion to the extent such gain is included in federal adjusted
gross income except that such gain shall not be subtracted if the gain is
derived from the sale of bullion as a taxable distribution from any
retirement plan account that holds gold or silver bullion. For the
purposes of this subsection, bullion has the same meaning as in section
77-2704.66.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2734.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-2734.01 (1)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
before January 1, 2026, residents (1) Residents of Nebraska who are
shareholders of a small business corporation having an election in effect
under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code or who are members of a
limited liability company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform
Limited Liability Company Act shall include in their Nebraska taxable
income, to the extent includable in federal gross income, their
-13-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
proportionate share of such corporation's or limited liability company's
federal income adjusted pursuant to this section. Income or loss from
such corporation or limited liability company conducting a business,
trade, profession, or occupation shall be included in the Nebraska
taxable income of a shareholder or member who is a resident of this state
to the extent of such shareholder's or member's proportionate share of
the net income or loss from the conduct of such business, trade,
profession, or occupation within this state, determined under subsection
(2) of this section. A resident of Nebraska shall include in Nebraska
taxable income fair compensation for services rendered to such
corporation or limited liability company. Compensation actually paid
shall be presumed to be fair unless it is apparent to the Tax
Commissioner that such compensation is materially different from fair
value for the services rendered or has been manipulated for tax avoidance
purposes.
(b) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, residents of Nebraska who are shareholders of a small
business corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of
the Internal Revenue Code or who are members of a limited liability
company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability
Company Act shall include in their Nebraska taxable income, to the extent
includable in federal gross income, their proportionate share of such
corporation's or limited liability company's federal income. A resident
of Nebraska shall include in Nebraska taxable income fair compensation
for services rendered to such corporation or limited liability company.
Compensation actually paid shall be presumed to be fair unless it is
apparent to the Tax Commissioner that such compensation is materially
different from fair value for the services rendered or has been
manipulated for tax avoidance purposes.
(2) The income of any small business corporation having an election
in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code or limited
-14-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
liability company organized pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act that is derived from or connected with Nebraska
sources shall be determined in the following manner:
(a) If the small business corporation is a member of a unitary
group, the small business corporation shall be deemed to be doing
business within this state if any part of its income is derived from
transactions with other members of the unitary group doing business
within this state, and such corporation shall apportion its income by
using the apportionment factor determined for the entire unitary group,
including the small business corporation, under sections 77-2734.05 to
77-2734.15;
(b) If the small business corporation or limited liability company
is not a member of a unitary group and is subject to tax in another
state, it shall apportion its income under sections 77-2734.05 to
77-2734.15; and
(c) If the small business corporation or limited liability company
is not subject to tax in another state, all of its income is derived from
or connected with Nebraska sources.
(3) Nonresidents of Nebraska who are shareholders of such
corporations or members of such limited liability companies shall file a
Nebraska income tax return and shall include in Nebraska adjusted gross
income their proportionate share of the corporation's or limited
liability company's Nebraska income as determined under subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) The nonresident shareholder or member shall execute and forward
to the corporation or limited liability company before the filing of the
corporation's or limited liability company's return an agreement which
states he or she will file a Nebraska income tax return and pay the tax
on the income derived from or connected with sources in this state, and
such agreement shall be attached to the corporation's or limited
liability company's Nebraska return for such taxable year.
-15-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
(5) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin before January 1,
2013, in the absence of the nonresident shareholder's or member's
executed agreement being attached to the Nebraska return, the corporation
or limited liability company shall remit with the return an amount equal
to the highest individual income tax rate determined under section
77-2715.02 multiplied by the nonresident shareholder's or member's share
of the corporation's or limited liability company's income which was
derived from or attributable to this state. For taxable years beginning
or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2013, in the absence of the
nonresident shareholder's or member's executed agreement being attached
to the Nebraska return, the corporation or limited liability company
shall remit with the return an amount equal to the highest individual
income tax rate determined under section 77-2715.03 multiplied by the
nonresident shareholder's or member's share of the corporation's or
limited liability company's income which was derived from or attributable
to this state. The amount remitted shall be allowed as a credit against
the Nebraska income tax liability of the shareholder or member.
(6) The Tax Commissioner may allow a nonresident individual
shareholder or member to not file a Nebraska income tax return if the
nonresident individual shareholder's or member's only source of Nebraska
income was his or her share of the small business corporation's or
limited liability company's income which was derived from or attributable
to sources within this state, the nonresident did not file an agreement
to file a Nebraska income tax return, and the small business corporation
or limited liability company has remitted the amount required by
subsection (5) of this section on behalf of such nonresident individual
shareholder or member. The amount remitted shall be retained in
satisfaction of the Nebraska income tax liability of the nonresident
individual shareholder or member.
(7) A small business corporation or limited liability company return
shall be filed if the small business corporation or limited liability
-16-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
company has income derived from Nebraska sources.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary:
(a) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2018, a small business corporation may annually make an irrevocable
election to pay the taxes, interest, or penalties levied by the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 at the entity level for the taxable period covered by
such return. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, such
election may be made on the applicable income tax return and shall be
made on or before the due date for filing the applicable income tax
return, including any extensions that have been granted;
(b) An electing small business corporation with respect to a taxable
period shall pay an income tax equivalent to the highest individual
income tax rate provided in section 77-2715.03 multiplied by the electing
small business corporation's net income as apportioned or allocated to
this state in accordance with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, for such
taxable period;
(c) An electing small business corporation shall be treated as a
corporation with respect to the requirements of section 77-2769 for
payments of estimated tax. The requirement for payment of estimated tax
under section 77-2769 shall not apply for tax years beginning prior to
January 1, 2024. Payments of estimated tax made by an eligible small
business corporation that does not make an election under this subsection
shall be treated as income tax withholding on behalf of the shareholders;
(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e) of this subsection, the
shareholders of an electing small business corporation shall file a
Nebraska return to report their pro rata or distributive share of the
income of the electing small business corporation in accordance with the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, as applicable. In determining the sum of
its pro rata or distributive share and computing the tax under this
subsection, an electing small business corporation shall add back any
amount of Nebraska income tax imposed under the Nebraska Revenue Act of
-17-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
1967 and deducted by the electing small business corporation for federal
income tax purposes under section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(e) A nonresident individual who is a shareholder of an electing
small business corporation shall not be required to file a Nebraska tax
return for a taxable year if, for such taxable year, the only source of
income derived from or connected with sources within this state for such
shareholder, or for the shareholder and the shareholder's spouse if a
joint federal income tax return is filed, is from one or more electing
small business corporations or electing partnerships as defined in
subdivision (7)(a) of section 77-2727 for such taxable year and such
nonresident individual shareholder's tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 would be fully satisfied by the credit allowed to such
shareholder under subdivision (g) of this subsection;
(f) If the amount calculated under subdivision (a) of this
subsection results in a net operating loss, such net operating loss may
not be carried forward to succeeding taxable years;
(g) A refundable credit shall be available to the shareholders in an
amount equal to their pro rata or distributive share of the Nebraska
income tax paid by the electing small business corporation. For tax
returns filed for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, such credit shall be allowed for the same taxable year
for which the election is made, without regard to the year in which the
tax is paid to Nebraska or deducted on a federal income tax return; and
(h)(i) For tax years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2018, but prior to January 1, 2023, the electing small
business corporation shall make the election under this subsection on or
after January 1, 2023, but before December 31, 2025, in the form and
manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner for all years for which the
election under this subsection is made on behalf of the electing small
business corporation. The Tax Commissioner shall establish the form and
manner, which shall not include any changes to the past returns other
-18-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
than those that are directly related to the election under this
subsection.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if an electing
small business corporation files in the form and manner as specified in
subdivision (h)(i) of this subsection, the deadline for filing a claim
for credit or refund prescribed in section 77-2793 shall be extended for
affected shareholders of the electing small business corporation until
the timeframe specified in section 77-2793 or January 31, 2026, whichever
is later. The resulting claim of refund for tax years beginning prior to
January 1, 2023, shall be submitted in the form and manner as prescribed
by the Tax Commissioner. Neither the electing small business corporation
nor its shareholders shall incur any penalties for late filing nor owe
interest on such amounts. The Tax Commissioner shall not be required to
pay interest on any amounts owed to the shareholders resulting from such
refund claims.
(iii) Notwithstanding the dates provided in subdivision (h)(i) of
this subsection, the Tax Commissioner shall have one year from the date
an electing small business corporation files in the form and manner as
specified in subdivision (h)(i) of this subsection to review and make a
written proposed deficiency determination in accordance with section
77-2786. Any notice of deficiency determination made as specified in this
subdivision may be enforced at any time within six years from the date of
the notice of deficiency determination.
(9) For purposes of this section:
(a) Electing small business corporation means, with respect to a
taxable period, an eligible small business corporation having an election
in effect under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code that has made
an election pursuant to subsection (8) of this section with respect to
such taxable period; and
(b) Eligible small business corporation means an entity subject to
taxation under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code and the
-19-

LB851 LB851
2026 2026
regulations thereunder.
(10) For purposes of this section, any shareholder or member of the
corporation or limited liability company that is a grantor trust of a
nonresident shall be disregarded and this section shall apply as though
the nonresident grantor was the shareholder or member.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-2716 and 77-2734.01, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-20-